Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 1. Protection from Domestic Abuse Law.

§ 93-21-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Protection from Domestic Abuse Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch 429, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 93-21-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abuse” means the occurrence of one or more of the following acts between spouses, former spouses, persons living as spouses or who formerly lived as spouses, persons having a child or children in common, other individuals related by consanguinity or affinity who reside together or who formerly resided together or between individuals who have a current or former dating relationship:

Attempting to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing bodily injury or serious bodily injury with or without a deadly weapon;

Placing, by physical menace or threat, another in fear of imminent serious bodily injury;

Criminal sexual conduct committed against a minor within the meaning of Section 97-5-23;

Stalking within the meaning of Section 97-3-107;

Cyberstalking within the meaning of Section 97-45-15; or

Sexual offenses within the meaning of Section 97-3-65 or 97-3-95.

“Abuse” does not include any act of self-defense.

“Adult” means any person eighteen (18) years of age or older, or any person under eighteen (18) years of age who has been emancipated by marriage.

“Court” means the chancery court, justice court, municipal court or county court.

“Dating relationship” means a social relationship of a romantic or intimate nature between two (2) individuals; it does not include a casual relationship or ordinary fraternization between two (2) individuals in a business or social context. Whether a relationship is a “dating relationship” shall be determined by examining the following factors:

The length of the relationship;

The type of relationship; and

The frequency of interaction between the two (2) individuals involved in the relationship.

“Mutual protection order” means a protection order that includes provisions in favor of both the individual seeking relief and the respondent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch 429, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 93-21-5.
Jurisdiction and venue.

The municipal justice, county or chancery court shall have jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter as provided in this chapter. The petitioner’s right to relief under this chapter shall not be affected by his leaving the residence or household to avoid further abuse.

Venue shall be proper in any county or municipality where the respondent resides or in any county or municipality where the alleged abusive act or acts occurred.

If a petition for an order for protection from domestic abuse is filed in a court lacking proper venue, the court, upon objection of the respondent, shall transfer the action to the appropriate venue pursuant to other applicable law.

A record shall be made of any proceeding in justice or municipal court that involves domestic abuse.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 93-21-7.
Petition to seek domestic abuse protection order; proper forum for petition alleging domestic abuse; waiver of filing fees in domestic abuse cases.

Any person may seek a domestic abuse protection order for himself by filing a petition alleging abuse by the respondent. Any parent, adult household member, or next friend of the abused person may seek a domestic abuse protection order on behalf of any minor children or any person alleged to be incompetent by filing a petition with the court alleging abuse by the respondent. Cases seeking relief under this chapter shall be priority cases on the court’s docket and the judge shall be immediately notified when a case is filed in order to provide for expedited proceedings.

A petition seeking a domestic abuse protection order may be filed in any of the following courts: municipal, justice, county or chancery. A chancery court shall not prohibit the filing of a petition which does not seek emergency relief on the basis that the petitioner did not first seek or obtain temporary relief in another court. A petition requesting emergency relief pending a hearing shall not be filed in chancery court unless specifically permitted by the chancellor under the circumstances or as a separate pleading in an ongoing chancery action between the parties. Nothing in this section shall:

Be construed to require consideration of emergency relief by a chancery court; or

Preclude a chancery court from entering an order of emergency relief.

The petitioner in any action brought pursuant to this chapter shall not bear the costs associated with its filing or the costs associated with the issuance or service of any notice of a hearing to the respondent, issuance or service of an order of protection on the respondent, or issuance or service of a warrant or witness subpoena. If the court finds that the petitioner is entitled to an order protecting the petitioner from abuse, the court shall be authorized to assess all costs including attorney’s fees of the proceedings to the respondent. The court may assess costs including attorney’s fees to the petitioner only if the allegations of abuse are determined to be without merit and the court finds that the petitioner is not a victim of abuse as defined by Section 93-21-3.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 93-21-9.
Contents of petition.

A petition filed under the provisions of this chapter shall state:

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the name, address and county of residence of each petitioner and of each individual alleged to have committed abuse;

The facts and circumstances concerning the alleged abuse;

The relationships between the petitioners and the individuals alleged to have committed abuse; and

A request for one or more domestic abuse protection orders.

If a petition requests a domestic abuse protection order for a spouse and alleges that the other spouse has committed abuse, the petition shall state whether or not a suit for divorce of the spouses is pending and, if so, in what jurisdiction.

Any temporary or permanent decree issued in a divorce proceeding subsequent to an order issued pursuant to this chapter may, in the discretion of the chancellor hearing the divorce proceeding, supersede in whole or in part the order issued pursuant to this chapter.

If a petitioner is a former spouse of an individual alleged to have committed abuse:

A copy of the decree of divorce shall be attached to the petition; or

The petition shall state the decree is currently unavailable to the petitioner and that a copy of the decree will be filed with the court before the time for the hearing on the petition.

If a petition requests a domestic abuse protection order for a child who is subject to the continuing jurisdiction of a youth court, family court or a chancery court, or alleges that a child who is subject to the continuing jurisdiction of a youth court, family court or chancery court has committed abuse:

A copy of the court orders affecting the custody or guardianship, possession and support of or access to the child shall be filed with the petition; or

The petition shall state that the orders affecting the child are currently unavailable to the petitioner and that a copy of the orders will be filed with the court before the hearing on the petition.

If the petition includes a request for emergency relief pending a hearing, the petition shall contain a general description of the facts and circumstances concerning the abuse and the need for immediate protection.

If the petition states that the disclosure of the petitioner’s address would risk abuse of the petitioner or any member of the petitioner’s family or household, or would reveal the confidential address of a shelter for domestic violence victims, the petitioner’s address may be omitted from the petition. If a petitioner’s address has been omitted from the petition pursuant to this subsection and the address of the petitioner is necessary to determine jurisdiction or venue, the disclosure of such address shall be made orally and in camera. A nonpublic record containing the address and contact information of a petitioner shall be maintained by the court to be utilized for court purposes only.

Every petition shall be signed by the petitioner under oath that the facts and circumstances contained in the petition are true to the best knowledge and belief of the petitioner.

The Attorney General, in cooperation with the Mississippi Supreme Court and the Mississippi Judicial College, shall develop a standardized form petition to be used when requesting a domestic abuse protection order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 93-21-11.
Notice and hearing.

Within ten (10) days of the filing of a petition under the provisions of this chapter, the court shall hold a hearing, at which time the petitioner must prove the allegation of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence.

The respondent shall be given notice of the filing of any petition and of the date, time and place set for the hearing by personal service of process. A court may conduct a hearing in the absence of the respondent after first ascertaining that the respondent was properly noticed of the hearing date, time and place.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 93-21-13.
Emergency domestic abuse protection order; duration of order; extension; entry of protection order into Mississippi Protection Order Registry; order effective in all U.S. states, territories and tribal lands.

The court in which a petition seeking emergency relief pending a hearing is filed must consider all such requests in an expedited manner and shall not refer or direct the matter to be sent to another court. The court may issue an emergency domestic abuse protection order without prior notice to the respondent upon good cause shown by the petitioner. Immediate and present danger of abuse to the petitioner, any minor children or any person alleged to be incompetent shall constitute good cause for issuance of an emergency domestic abuse protection order. The respondent shall be provided with notice of the entry of any emergency domestic abuse protection order issued by the court by personal service of process.

A court granting an emergency domestic abuse protection order may grant relief as provided in Section 93-21-15(1)(a).

An emergency domestic abuse protection order shall be effective for ten (10) days, or until a hearing may be held, whichever occurs first. If a hearing under this subsection (1) is continued, the court may grant or extend the emergency order as it deems necessary for the protection of the abused person. A continuance under this subsection (1)(c) shall be valid for no longer than twenty (20) days.

The Attorney General, in cooperation with the Mississippi Supreme Court and the Mississippi Judicial College, shall develop standardized forms for emergency domestic abuse protection orders. Use of the standardized forms in protection order proceedings pursuant to this chapter shall be fully implemented by all courts no later than July 1, 2015. However, in any criminal prosecution or contempt proceeding for a violation of a domestic abuse protection order, it shall not be a defense that the order was not issued on the standardized form.

Upon issuance of any protection order by the court, the order shall be entered into the Mississippi Protection Order Registry by the clerk of the court pursuant to Section 93-21-25, and a copy provided to the sheriff’s department in the county of the court of issuance.

An emergency domestic abuse protection order issued under this section is effective in this state, in all other states, and in United States territories and tribal lands. A court shall not limit the scope of a protection order to the boundaries of the State of Mississippi or to the boundaries of a municipality or county within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 353, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 471, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 337, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 10; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012; Laws, 2019, ch. 460, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 93-21-15.
Temporary domestic abuse protection orders; relief; duration; final domestic abuse protection order or consent agreements; provisions addressing custody, visitation or support of minor children; order to set forth findings of fact and provide details of acts restrained; order to be entered into Mississippi Protection Order Registry; modification, amendment or dissolution of order; order effective in all U.S. states, territories and tribal lands.

After a hearing is held as provided in Section 93-21-11 for which notice and opportunity to be heard has been granted to the respondent, and upon a finding that the petitioner has proved the existence of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence, the municipal and justice courts shall be empowered to grant a temporary domestic abuse protection order to bring about a cessation of abuse of the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent. The relief the court may provide includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Directing the respondent to refrain from abusing the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent;

Prohibiting or limiting respondent’s physical proximity to the abused or other household members as designated by the court, including residence and place of work;

Prohibiting or limiting contact by the respondent with the abused or other household members designated by the court, whether in person, by telephone or by other electronic communication;

Granting possession to the petitioner of the residence or household to the exclusion of the respondent by evicting the respondent or restoring possession to the petitioner, or both; or

Prohibiting the transferring, encumbering or otherwise disposing of property mutually owned or leased by the parties, except when in the ordinary course of business.

The duration of any temporary domestic abuse protection order issued by a municipal or justice court shall not exceed thirty (30) days. However, if the party to be protected and the respondent do not have minor children in common, the duration of the temporary domestic abuse protection order may exceed thirty (30) days but shall not exceed one (1) year.

Procedures for an appeal of the issuance of a temporary domestic abuse protection order are set forth in Section 93-21-15.1.

After a hearing is held as provided in Section 93-21-11 for which notice and opportunity to be heard has been granted to the respondent, and upon a finding that the petitioner has proved the existence of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence, the chancery or county court shall be empowered to grant a final domestic abuse protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent. In granting a final domestic abuse protection order, the chancery or county court may provide for relief that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Directing the respondent to refrain from abusing the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent;

Granting possession to the petitioner of the residence or household to the exclusion of the respondent by evicting the respondent or restoring possession to the petitioner, or both;

When the respondent has a duty to support the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent living in the residence or household and the respondent is the sole owner or lessee, granting possession to the petitioner of the residence or household to the exclusion of the respondent by evicting the respondent or restoring possession to the petitioner, or both, or by consent agreement allowing the respondent to provide suitable, alternate housing;

Awarding temporary custody of or establishing temporary visitation rights with regard to any minor children or any person alleged to be incompetent, or both;

If the respondent is legally obligated to support the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent, ordering the respondent to pay temporary support for the petitioner, any minor children, or any person alleged to be incompetent;

Ordering the respondent to pay to the abused person monetary compensation for losses suffered as a direct result of the abuse, including, but not limited to, medical expenses resulting from such abuse, loss of earnings or support, out-of-pocket losses for injuries sustained, moving expenses, a reasonable attorney’s fee, or any combination of the above;

Prohibiting the transferring, encumbering, or otherwise disposing of property mutually owned or leased by the parties, except when in the ordinary course of business;

Prohibiting or limiting respondent’s physical proximity to the abused or other household members designated by the court, including residence, school and place of work;

Prohibiting or limiting contact by the respondent with the abused or other household members designated by the court whether in person, by telephone or by electronic communication; and

Ordering counseling or professional medical treatment for the respondent, including counseling or treatment designed to bring about the cessation of domestic abuse.

Except as provided below, a final domestic abuse protection order issued by a chancery or county court under the provisions of this chapter shall be effective for such time period as the court deems appropriate. The expiration date of the order shall be clearly stated in the order.

Temporary provisions addressing temporary custody, visitation or support of minor children contained in a final domestic abuse protection order issued by a chancery or county court shall be effective for one hundred eighty (180) days. A party seeking relief beyond that period must initiate appropriate proceedings in the chancery court of appropriate jurisdiction. If at the end of the one-hundred-eighty-day period, neither party has initiated such proceedings, the custody, visitation or support of minor children will revert to the chancery court order addressing such terms that was in effect at the time the domestic abuse protection order was granted. The chancery court in which custody, visitation or support proceedings have been initiated may provide for any temporary provisions addressing custody, visitation or support as the court deems appropriate.

Every domestic abuse protection order issued pursuant to this section shall set forth the reasons for its issuance, shall contain specific findings of fact regarding the existence of abuse, shall be specific in its terms and shall describe in reasonable detail the act or acts to be prohibited. No mutual protection order shall be issued unless that order is supported by an independent petition by each party requesting relief pursuant to this chapter, and the order contains specific findings of fact regarding the existence of abuse by each party as principal aggressor, and a finding that neither party acted in self-defense.

The Attorney General, in cooperation with the Mississippi Supreme Court and the Mississippi Judicial College, shall develop standardized forms for temporary and final domestic abuse protection orders. The use of standardized forms in protection order proceedings pursuant to this chapter shall be fully implemented by all courts no later than July 1, 2015. However, in any criminal prosecution or contempt proceeding for a violation of a domestic abuse protection order, it shall not be a defense that the order was not issued on the standardized form.

Upon issuance of any protection order by the court, the order shall be entered in the Mississippi Protection Order Registry by the clerk of the court pursuant to Section 93-21-25, and a copy shall be provided to the sheriff’s department in the county of the court of issuance.

Upon subsequent petition by either party and following a hearing of which both parties have received notice and an opportunity to be heard, the court may modify, amend, or dissolve a domestic abuse protection order previously issued by that court.

A domestic abuse protection order issued under this section is effective in this state, in all other states, and in United States territories and tribal lands. A court shall not limit the scope of a protection order to the boundaries of the State of Mississippi or to the boundaries of a municipality or county within the State of Mississippi.

Procedures for an appeal of the issuance or denial of a final domestic abuse protection order are set forth in Section 93-21-15.1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 8; Laws, 2002, ch. 337, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 463, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2019, ch. 460, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 93-21-15.1.
Appeal of temporary or final domestic abuse protection order.

De novo appeal.Any party aggrieved by the decision of a municipal or justice court judge to issue a temporary domestic abuse protection order has the right of a trial de novo on appeal in the chancery court having jurisdiction. The trial de novo shall be held within ten (10) days of the filing of a notice of appeal. All such appeals shall be priority cases and the judge must be immediately notified when an appeal is filed in order to provide for expedited proceedings. The appeal will proceed as if a petition for an order of protection from domestic abuse had been filed in the chancery court. Following the trial de novo, if the petitioner has proved the existence of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence, the chancery court may grant a final domestic abuse protection order. In granting a final domestic abuse protection order, the chancery court may provide for relief that includes, but is not limited to, the relief set out in Section 93-21-15(2).

Notice of appeal.The party desiring to appeal a decision from municipal or justice court must file a written notice of appeal with the chancery court clerk within ten (10) days of the issuance of a domestic abuse protection order. In all de novo appeals, the notice of appeal and payment of costs must be simultaneously filed and paid with the chancery clerk. Costs for an appeal by trial de novo shall be calculated as specified in subsection (4) of this section. The written notice of appeal must specify the party or parties taking the appeal and must designate the judgment or order from which the appeal is taken. A copy of the notice of appeal must be provided to all parties or their attorneys of record and to the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken. A certificate of service must accompany the written notice of appeal. Upon receipt by the municipal or justice court of the notice of appeal, the clerk of the lower court shall immediately provide the entire court file to the chancery clerk.

Appeals on the record.Any party aggrieved by the decision of a county court to issue a final domestic abuse protection order or to deny such an order shall be entitled to an appeal on the record in the chancery court having jurisdiction. If the county court has issued a domestic abuse protection order as a temporary order instead of a final order as contemplated by Section 93-21-15(2), the chancery court shall permit the appeal on the record and shall treat the temporary order issued by the county court as a final order on the matter. The chancery court shall treat the appeal as a priority matter and render a decision as expeditiously as possible.

Notice of appeal and filing the record.The party desiring to appeal a decision from county court must file a written notice of appeal with the chancery court clerk within ten (10) days of the issuance of a domestic abuse protection order. In all appeals, the notice of appeal and payment of costs, where costs are applicable, shall be simultaneously filed and paid with the chancery clerk. Costs shall be calculated as specified in subsection (4) of this section. The written notice of appeal must specify the party or parties taking the appeal and must designate the judgment or order from which the appeal is taken. A copy of the notice of appeal must be provided to all parties or their attorneys of record and to the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken. A certificate of service must accompany the written notice of appeal. In all appeals in which the appeal is solely on the record, the record from the county court must be filed with the chancery clerk within thirty (30) days of filing of the notice of appeal. However, in cases involving a transcript, the court reporter or county court may request an extension of time. The court, on its own motion or on application of any party, may compel the compilation and transmission of the record of proceedings. Failure to file the record with the court clerk or to request the assistance of the court in compelling the same within thirty (30) days of the filing of the written notice of appeal may be deemed an abandonment of the appeal and the court may dismiss the same with costs to the appealing party or parties, unless a party or parties is exempt from costs as specified in subsection (4) of this section.

Briefs on appeal on the record.Briefs, if any, filed in an appeal on the record must conform to the practice in the Supreme Court as to form and time of filing and service, except that the parties should file only an original and one (1) copy of each brief. The consequences of failure to timely file a brief will be the same as in the Supreme Court.

Supersedeas.The perfecting of an appeal, whether on the record or by trial de novo, does not act as a supersedeas. Any domestic abuse protection order issued by a municipal, justice or county court shall remain in full force and effect for the duration of the appeal, unless the domestic abuse protection order otherwise expires due to the passage of time.

Cost bond.In all appeals under this section, unless the court allows an appeal in forma pauperis or the appellant otherwise qualifies for exemption as specified in this subsection (4), the appellant shall pay all court costs incurred below and likely to be incurred on appeal as estimated by the chancery clerk. In all cases where the appellant is appealing the denial of an order of protection from domestic abuse by a county court, the appellant shall not be required to pay any costs associated with the appeal, including service of process fees, nor shall the appellant be required to appeal in forma pauperis. In such circumstances, the court may assess costs of the appeal to the appellant if the court finds that the allegations of abuse are without merit and the appellant is not a victim of abuse. Where the issuance of a mutual protection order is the basis of the appeal, the appellant may be entitled to reimbursement of appellate costs paid to the court as a matter of equity if the chancery court finds that the mutual order was issued by the lower court without regard to the requirements of Section 93-21-15(3).

The appellate procedures set forth in this section for appeals from justice, municipal and county courts shall control if there is a conflict with another statute or rule.

Any party aggrieved by the issuance or denial of a final order of protection by a chancery court shall be entitled to appeal the decision. The appeal shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Appellate Procedure and any other applicable rules or statutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 460, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 93-21-16.
Full faith and credit for certain protective orders issued in other jurisdictions.

A protective order from another jurisdiction issued to protect the applicant from abuse as defined in Section 93-21-3, or a protection order as defined in Section 93-22-3, issued by a tribunal of another state shall be accorded full faith and credit by the courts of this state and enforced in this state as provided for in the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

For purposes of enforcement by Mississippi law enforcement officers, a protective order from another jurisdiction, or a protection order as defined in Section 93-22-3 and issued by a tribunal of another state, is presumed to be valid if it meets the requirements of Section 93-22-7.

For purposes of judicial enforcement of a protective order issued in another jurisdiction, or a protection order as defined in Section 93-22-3 and issued by a tribunal of another state, an order is presumed valid if it meets the requirements of Section 93-22-5(4). It is an affirmative defense in any action seeking enforcement of a protective order issued in another jurisdiction, or a protection order as defined in Section 93-22-3 and issued by a tribunal of another state, that any criteria for the validity of the order is absent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 552, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 11; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 93-21-17.
Grant of relief not to affect property titles or availability of other remedies; court approval required to amend orders.

The granting of any relief authorized under this chapter shall not preclude any other relief provided by law.

The court may amend its order or agreement at any time upon subsequent petition filed by either party. Protective orders issued under the provisions of this chapter may only be amended by approval of the court.

No order or agreement under this chapter shall in any manner affect title to any real property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 93-21-19.
Testimony by spouses not to be restricted.

There shall be no restrictions concerning a spouse testifying against his spouse in any hearing under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 93-21-21.
Knowing violation of protection orders, court-approved consent agreements or bond conditions issued by Mississippi or foreign courts is misdemeanor or contempt; penalties.

Upon a knowing violation of (a) a protection order or court-approved consent agreement issued pursuant to this chapter, (b) a similar order issued by a foreign court of competent jurisdiction for the purpose of protecting a person from domestic abuse, or (c) a bond condition imposed pursuant to Section 99-5-37, the person violating the order or condition commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months or a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

Alternatively, upon a knowing violation of a protection order or court-approved consent agreement issued pursuant to this chapter or a bond condition issued pursuant to Section 99-5-37, the issuing court may hold the person violating the order or bond condition in contempt, the contempt to be punishable as otherwise provided by applicable law. A person shall not be both convicted of a misdemeanor and held in contempt for the same violation of an order or bond condition.

When investigating allegations of a violation under subsection (1) of this section, law enforcement officers shall utilize the uniform offense report prescribed for this purpose by the Office of the Attorney General in consultation with the sheriff’s and police chief’s associations. However, failure of law enforcement to utilize the uniform offense report shall not be a defense to a crime charged under subsection (1) of this section.

In any conviction for a violation of a domestic abuse protection order as described in subsection (1) of this section, the court shall enter the disposition of the matter into the corresponding uniform offense report.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the court’s authority, if any, to address bond condition violations in a more restrictive manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 11; Laws, 2003, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 93-21-23.
Participants in reports or proceedings presumed acting in good faith; immunity from liability.

Any licensed doctor of medicine, licensed doctor of dentistry, intern, resident or registered nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, preacher, teacher, attorney, law enforcement officer, or any other person or institution participating in the making of a report pursuant to this chapter or participating in judicial proceedings resulting therefrom shall be presumed to be acting in good faith, and if found to have acted in good faith shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. The reporting of an abused person shall not constitute a breach of confidentiality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch 429, § 12; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 93-21-25.
Mississippi Protection Order Registry; certain orders to be maintained in registry; duties of clerk of issuing court; process for entry and removal of orders.

In order to provide a statewide registry for protection orders and to aid law enforcement, prosecutors and courts in handling such matters, the Attorney General is authorized to create and administer a Mississippi Protection Order Registry. The Attorney General’s office shall implement policies and procedures governing access to the registry by authorized users, which shall include provisions addressing the confidentiality of any information which may tend to reveal the location or identity of a victim of domestic abuse.

All orders issued pursuant to Sections 93-21-1 through 93-21-29, 97-3-7(11), 97-3-65(6) or 97-3-101(5) will be maintained in the Mississippi Protection Order Registry. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the issuing court to enter all civil and criminal domestic abuse protection orders and all criminal sexual assault protection orders, including any modifications, amendments or dismissals of such orders, into the Mississippi Protection Order Registry within twenty-four (24) hours of issuance with no exceptions for weekends or holidays. A separate copy of any order shall be provided to the sheriff’s department TAC officers of the county of the issuing court. The copy may be provided in electronic format. Each qualifying protection order submitted to the Mississippi Protection Order Registry shall be automatically transmitted to the National Criminal Information Center Protection Order File. Failure of the clerk to enter the order into the registry or to provide a copy of the order to law enforcement shall have no effect on the validity or enforcement of an otherwise valid protection order.

Any information regarding the registration or issuance of a civil or criminal domestic abuse protection order or a criminal sexual assault protection order, or the filing of a petition for a civil domestic abuse protection order which is maintained in the Mississippi Protection Order Registry and would tend to reveal the identity or location of the protected person(s) shall not constitute a public record and shall be exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. This information may be disclosed to appropriate law enforcement, prosecutors or courts for protection order enforcement purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 13; Laws, 2007, ch. 589, § 8; Laws, 2009, ch. 433, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 332, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 414, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2017).

§ 93-21-27.
Immunity of law enforcement officers for arrests arising from incidents of domestic violence.

A law enforcement officer shall not be held liable in any civil action for an arrest based on probable cause, enforcement in good faith of a court order, or any other action or omission in good faith under this chapter arising from an alleged domestic violence incident brought by any authorized party, or an arrest made in good faith pursuant to Section 99-3-7(3), or failure, in good faith, to make an arrest pursuant to Section 99-3-7(3).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 14; Laws, 1988, ch. 571, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 21, 1988).

§ 93-21-28.
Emergency law enforcement response in domestic abuse cases.

A person who alleges that he or she or a minor child has been the victim of domestic violence may request the assistance of a local law enforcement agency. The local law enforcement agency shall respond to the request for assistance. The local law enforcement officer responding to the request for assistance shall take whatever steps are reasonably necessary to protect the complainant from harm and shall advise the complainant of sources of shelter, medical care, counseling and other services. Upon request by the complainant and where feasible, the law enforcement officer shall transport the complainant to appropriate facilities such as hospitals or public or private facilities for shelter and accompany the complainant to his or her residence, within the jurisdiction in which the request for assistance was made, so that the complainant may remove food, clothing, medication and such other personal property as is reasonably necessary to enable the complainant and any minor children who are presently in the care of the complainant to remain elsewhere pending further proceedings.

In providing the assistance authorized by subsection (1), no officer may be held criminally or civilly liable on account of reasonable measures taken under authority of subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 569, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 93-21-29.
Proceedings to be in addition to other civil or criminal remedies.

Any proceeding under this chapter shall be in addition to other available civil or criminal remedies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 429, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1981.